apertium-bb-en/apertium-tr-en.tr.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
	<alphabet>ABCÇDEFGĞHIİJKLMNOÖPRSŞTUÜVYZabcçdefgğhıijklmnoöprsştuüvyz</alphabet>

	<sdefs>
	<sdef n="n"/>
        <sdef n="adv"     c="Adverb"/>
        <sdef n="adv_raw"/>
        <sdef n="adv_plus"/>
	<sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
	<sdef n="det"/>
	<sdef n="pr"/>
	<sdef n="pron"/>
	<sdef n="pos"/>
	<sdef n="sg"/>
	<sdef n="pl"/>
	<sdef n="sp"/>
	<sdef n="def"/>
	<sdef n="num"/>
	<sdef n="vblex"/>
	<sdef n="p1"/>
	<sdef n="p2"/>
	<sdef n="pri"/>
        <sdef n="pr"/>

	</sdefs>
	<pardefs>
		<pardef n="yavaş__adv">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="adv"/><s n="adv_raw"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ça</l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="adv_plus"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="ve__cnjcoo">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="veya__cnjcoo">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="altında__pr">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>	
		<pardef n="heryer__n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="o__pron">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="pron"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="sandalye__n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ler</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="aramak__v">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s  n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
	</pardefs>

	<section id="main" type="standard">
		
<!-- Conjunctions -->

		<e lm="ve"><i>ve</i><par n="ve__cnjcoo"/></e>
		<e lm="veya"><i>veya</i><par n="veya__cnjcoo"/></e>
		<e lm="ama"><i>ama</i><par n="ve__cnjcoo"/></e>


 <!-- Prepositions -->
		<e lm="altında"><i>altında</i><par n="altında__pr"/></e>	
	
		<e lm="içinden"><i>içinden</i><par n="altında__pr"/></e>	
 <!-- Nouns -->
		
		<e lm="bahçe"><i>bahçe</i><par n="sandalye__n"/></e>
		<e lm="masa"><i>masa</i><par n="sandalye__n"/></e>
		<e lm="sandalye"><i>sandalye</i><par n="sandalye__n"/></e>
		<e lm="heryer"><i>heryer</i><par n="heryer__n"/></e>
		<e lm="hala"><i>hala</i><par n="heryer__n"/></e>
 <!-- Prouns -->
		<e lm="o"><i>o</i><par n="o__pron"/></e>

 <!-- adverbs -->
		<e lm="yavaş"><i>yavaş</i><par n="yavaş__adv"/></e>
 <!-- Verbs -->

		<e lm="yürümek"><i>yürümek</i><par n="aramak__v"/></e>
		<e lm="aramak"><i>aramak</i><par n="aramak__v"/></e>
		<e lm="bulmak"><i>bulmak</i><par n="aramak__v"/></e>		
		<e lm="denemek"><i>denemek</i><par n="aramak__v"/></e>	

	</section>

</dictionary>
